parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/FRENCH/APPLICATIONS/ACCENTUATION/FST2/src/lex-more.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     additional lexicon entries
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    FRENCH
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	10-Aug-2007 (AS)
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# ============================================================================

LEXICON IMONTH		+Noun+Month	MSG;	! islamic month name

LEXICON ROOT 
PDG[s]+Noun+Common+Acron	MSGPL;

! months
janvier[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
février[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
mars+Noun+Month				MSGPL;
avril[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
mai+Noun+Month				MSG;	! removed plural "mais"
juin[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
juillet[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
août[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
septembre[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
octobre[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
novembre[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;
décembre[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL;

! short forms:
janvier+Noun+Month+Abbr:jan(.)		#;
janvier+Noun+Month+Abbr:janv(.)		#;
février+Noun+Month+Abbr:fév(.)		#;
février+Noun+Month+Abbr:févr(.)		#;
avril+Noun+Month+Abbr:avr(.)		#;
juillet+Noun+Month+Abbr:juil(.)		#;
septembre+Noun+Month+Abbr:sep(.)	#;
septembre+Noun+Month+Abbr:sept(.)	#;
octobre+Noun+Month+Abbr:oct(.)		#;
novembre+Noun+Month+Abbr:nov(.)		#;
décembre+Noun+Month+Abbr:déc(.)		#;

! revolution month names
floréal[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
frimaire[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
fructidor[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
ventôse[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
vendémiaire[s]+Noun+Month		MSGPL; 
brumaire[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
pluviôse[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
prairial[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
germinal[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
messidor[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
nivôse[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 
thermidor[s]+Noun+Month			MSGPL; 

! week days
lundi[s]+Noun+Weekday			MSGPL;
mardi[s]+Noun+Weekday			MSGPL;
mercredi[s]+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;
jeudi[s]+Noun+Weekday			MSGPL;
verndredi[s]+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;
samedi[s]+Noun+Weekday			MSGPL;
dimanche[s]+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;

! short forms
lundi+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:lun(.)		#;
mardi+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:mar(.)		#;
mercredi+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:mer(.)	#;
jeudi+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:jeu(.)		#;
vendredi+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:ven(.)	#;
samedi+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:sam(.)		#;
dimanche+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:dim(.)	#;



! additional entries for time expressions
brejnévien[2e][s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
cénozoïque[s]+Adj+Qual			MFSGPL;
cénozoïque[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;
éoarchéen[2e][s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
éoarchéen[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;
hadéen[2e][s]+Adj+Qual			MFSGPL;
hadéen[s]+Noun+Common			MSGPL;
mésoarchéen[2e][s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
mésoarchéen[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;
mésoprotérozoïque[s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
mésoprotérozoïque[s]+Noun+Common	MSGPL;
néoarchéen[2e][s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
néoarchéen[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;
néoprotérozoïque[s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
néoprotérozoïque[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;
paléoarchéen[2e][s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
paléoarchéen[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;
phanérozoïque[s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
phanérozoïque[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;
protérozoïque[s]+Adj+Qual		MFSGPL;
protérozoïque[s]+Noun+Common		MSGPL;




!# islamic month names

	
< m o u h a r (r) [a|e] m >		IMONTH; !1
< s a f a r >				IMONTH; !2
< r a b i (a) MSEP >			IMONTH2; !3,4
< r a b i (a) %  I (I) >		IMONTH;
< (d) j o u m a d a MSEP >		IMONTH2;
< (d) j o u m a d a %  I (I) >		IMONTH;
< r a (d) j a b >			IMONTH;
< c h a [a|%'] b a n (e) >		IMONTH;
< r a m a d a n >			IMONTH;
< c h a w (w) a l >			IMONTH;
< d [h (o)|o] u MSEP >			IMONTH3;


LEXICON IMONTH2
< a l MSEP a w (w) a l >		IMONTH;
< ([a|e]) l MSEP o u l a >		IMONTH;
< [a|e] l MSEP t (h) a n i (a) >	IMONTH;
< a t (h) MSEP t (h) a n i (a) >	IMONTH;
< [a|e] t (h) a n i (a) >		IMONTH;
< o u t MSEP t a n i (a) >		IMONTH;

LEXICON IMONTH3 
<a l MSEP q [i|a] (%') d a >		IMONTH;
<a l MSEP h i (d) j [i|j] a >		IMONTH;
